fst/nom_paradigms.lexc
! Nominal paradigm form productions — STEM + ENDING decomposition.
! Each paradigm has a stem lexicon (sg/pl stems) and ending lexicons.
! Surface form = stem + ending.

! ============================================================
! PRONOUNS — irregular, full forms stored
! ============================================================

! 9 — kas
LEXICON P9
  +Sg+Nom+Masc:kas        # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Masc:kasse      # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Masc:kasmu      # ;
  +Sg+Akk+Masc:kan        # ;
  +Pl+Nom+Masc:kwāi       # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Masc:kwēisan    # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Masc:kwēimans   # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Masc:kans       # ;
  +Sg+Nom+Fem:kwāi        # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Fem:kasses      # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Fem:kassei      # ;
  +Sg+Akk+Fem:kan         # ;
  +Pl+Nom+Fem:kwās        # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Fem:kwēisan     # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Fem:kwēimans    # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Fem:kans        # ;
  +Sg+Nom+Neut:ka         # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Neut:kasse      # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Neut:kasmu      # ;
  +Sg+Akk+Neut:ka         # ;
  +Pl+Nom+Neut:ka         # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Neut:kasse      # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Neut:kasmu      # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Neut:ka         # ;

! 10 — dis
LEXICON P10
  +Sg+Nom+Masc:dis        # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Masc:din        # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Masc:din        # ;
  +Sg+Akk+Masc:din        # ;
  +Pl+Nom+Masc:dei        # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Masc:dins       # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Masc:dins       # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Masc:dins       # ;
  +Sg+Nom+Fem:dis         # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Fem:din         # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Fem:din         # ;
  +Sg+Akk+Fem:din         # ;
  +Pl+Nom+Fem:dei         # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Fem:dins        # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Fem:dins        # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Fem:dins        # ;
  +Sg+Nom+Neut:di         # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Neut:di         # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Neut:di         # ;
  +Sg+Akk+Neut:di         # ;
  +Pl+Nom+Neut:di         # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Neut:di         # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Neut:di         # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Neut:di         # ;

! 12 — tāns
LEXICON P12
  +Sg+Nom+Masc:tāns       # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Masc:tenesse    # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Masc:tenesmu    # ;
  +Sg+Akk+Masc:tennan     # ;
  +Pl+Nom+Masc:tenēi      # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Masc:tenēisan   # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Masc:tenēimans  # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Masc:tennans    # ;

! 13 — tenā
LEXICON P13
  +Sg+Nom+Fem:tenā        # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Fem:tenesses    # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Fem:tenessei    # ;
  +Sg+Akk+Fem:tennan      # ;
  +Pl+Nom+Fem:tennas      # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Fem:tenēisan    # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Fem:tenēimans   # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Fem:tennans     # ;

! 15 — šis
LEXICON P15
  +Sg+Nom+Masc:šis        # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Masc:šisse      # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Masc:šismu      # ;
  +Sg+Akk+Masc:šin        # ;
  +Pl+Nom+Masc:šāi        # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Masc:šēisan     # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Masc:šēimans    # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Masc:šans       # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Akk+Masc:šins  # ;
  +Sg+Nom+Fem:šī          # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Fem:šisses      # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Fem:šissei      # ;
  +Sg+Akk+Fem:šan         # ;
  +Pl+Nom+Fem:šās         # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Fem:šēisan      # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Fem:šēimans     # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Fem:šans        # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Akk+Fem:šins  # ;
  +Sg+Nom+Neut:šin        # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Neut:šisse      # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Neut:šismu      # ;
  +Sg+Akk+Neut:šin        # ;
  +Pl+Nom+Neut:šāi        # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Neut:šēisan     # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Neut:šēimans    # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Neut:šans       # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Akk+Neut:šins  # ;

! 17 — wiss
LEXICON P17
  +Sg+Nom+Masc:wiss       # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Masc:wisse      # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Masc:wismu      # ;
  +Sg+Akk+Masc:wissan     # ;
  +Pl+Nom+Masc:wisāi      # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Masc:wisēisan   # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Masc:wisēimans  # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Masc:wissans    # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Akk+Masc:wisans   # ;
  +Sg+Nom+Fem:wisā        # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Fem:wissas      # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Fem:wissai      # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Dat+Fem:wisssai   # ;
  +Sg+Akk+Fem:wissan      # ;
  +Pl+Nom+Fem:wissas      # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Fem:wissan      # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Fem:wisāmans    # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Fem:wissans     # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Akk+Fem:wisans    # ;
  +Sg+Nom+Neut:wissan     # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Neut:wisse      # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Neut:wismu      # ;
  +Sg+Akk+Neut:wissan     # ;
  +Pl+Nom+Neut:wisāi      # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Neut:wisēisan   # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Neut:wisēimans  # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Neut:wissans    # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Akk+Neut:wisans    # ;

! 19 — kawīds
LEXICON P19
  +Sg+Nom+Masc:kawīds     # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Masc:kawīdse    # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Masc:kawīdsmu   # ;
  +Sg+Akk+Masc:kawīdan    # ;
  +Pl+Nom+Masc:kawīdai    # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Masc:kawīdan    # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Masc:kawīdamans # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Masc:kawīdans   # ;
  +Sg+Nom+Fem:kawīda      # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Fem:kawīdses    # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Fem:kawīdsei    # ;
  +Sg+Akk+Fem:kawīdan     # ;
  +Pl+Nom+Fem:kawīdas     # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Fem:kawīdan     # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Fem:kawīdamans  # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Fem:kawīdans    # ;
  +Sg+Nom+Neut:kawīdan    # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Neut:kawīdse    # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Neut:kawīdsmu   # ;
  +Sg+Akk+Neut:kawīdan    # ;
  +Pl+Nom+Neut:kawīdai    # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Neut:kawīdan    # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Neut:kawīdamans # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Neut:kawīdans   # ;

! 20 — majs
LEXICON P20
  +Sg+Nom+Masc:majs       # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Masc:māise      # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Masc:majasmu    # ;
  +Sg+Akk+Masc:majjan     # ;
  +Pl+Nom+Masc:majāi      # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Masc:māisan     # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Masc:māimans    # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Masc:majjans    # ;
  +Sg+Nom+Fem:majā        # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Fem:majāses     # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Fem:majjai      # ;
  +Sg+Akk+Fem:majjan      # ;
  +Pl+Nom+Fem:majjas      # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Fem:majāsan     # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Fem:majāmans    # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Fem:majjans     # ;
  +Sg+Nom+Neut:majjan     # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Neut:māise      # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Neut:majasmu    # ;
  +Sg+Akk+Neut:majjan     # ;
  +Pl+Nom+Neut:majāi      # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Neut:māisan     # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Neut:māimans    # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Neut:majjans    # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Akk+Neut:majans   # ;

! ============================================================
! NUMERALS
! ============================================================

! 22 — abbai
LEXICON Num22
  +Pl+Nom+Masc:abbai      # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Masc:abbejan    # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Masc:abbeimas   # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Masc:abbans     # ;
  +Pl+Nom+Fem:abbai       # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Fem:abbejan     # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Fem:abbeimas    # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Fem:abbans      # ;
  +Pl+Nom+Neut:abbai      # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Neut:abbejan    # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Neut:abbeimas   # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Neut:abbans     # ;

! ============================================================
! ADJECTIVES — full forms (3-gender, stem allomorphy makes decomposition impractical)
! ============================================================

! 25 — debīks
LEXICON A25
  +Sg+Nom+Masc:debīks     # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Masc:debīkas    # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Masc:debīkasmu  # ;
  +Sg+Akk+Masc:debīkan    # ;
  +Pl+Nom+Masc:debīkai    # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Masc:debīkan    # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Masc:debīkamans # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Masc:debīkans   # ;
  +Sg+Nom+Fem:debīka      # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Fem:debīkas     # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Fem:debīkai     # ;
  +Sg+Akk+Fem:debīkan     # ;
  +Pl+Nom+Fem:debīkas     # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Fem:debīkan     # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Fem:debīkamans  # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Fem:debīkans    # ;
  +Sg+Nom+Neut:debīkan    # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Neut:debīkas    # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Neut:debīkasmu  # ;
  +Sg+Akk+Neut:debīkan    # ;
  +Pl+Nom+Neut:debīkai    # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Neut:debīkan    # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Neut:debīkamans # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Neut:debīkans   # ;

! 26 — labs
LEXICON A26
  +Sg+Nom+Masc:labs       # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Masc:labbas     # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Masc:labàsmu    # ;
  +Sg+Akk+Masc:labban     # ;
  +Pl+Nom+Masc:labāi      # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Masc:labban     # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Masc:labammans  # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Masc:labbans    # ;
  +Sg+Nom+Fem:labā        # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Fem:labbas      # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Fem:labbai      # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Sg+Dat+Fem:labai     # ;
  +Sg+Akk+Fem:labban      # ;
  +Pl+Nom+Fem:labbas      # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Fem:labban      # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Fem:labāmans    # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Fem:labbans     # ;
  +Sg+Nom+Neut:labban     # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Neut:labbas     # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Neut:labàsmu    # ;
  +Sg+Akk+Neut:labban     # ;
  +Pl+Nom+Neut:labāi      # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Neut:labban     # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Neut:labammans  # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Neut:labbans    # ;

! ============================================================
! NOUNS — STEM + ENDING
! ============================================================

! Paradigm 32 — wīrs (masc o-stem: stem = lemma - "s")
LEXICON N32_sg
  +Sg+Nom+Masc:s      # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Masc:as     # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Masc:u      # ;
  +Sg+Akk+Masc:an     # ;
LEXICON N32_pl
  +Pl+Nom+Masc:ai     # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Masc:an     # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Masc:amans  # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Masc:ans    # ;

! Paradigm 34 — aliskans (masc n-stem: stem = lemma - "ans")
LEXICON N34_sg
  +Sg+Nom+Masc:ans    # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Masc:nas    # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Masc:nu     # ;
  +Sg+Akk+Masc:nan    # ;
LEXICON N34_pl
  +Pl+Nom+Masc:nai    # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Masc:nan    # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Masc:namans # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Masc:nans   # ;

! Paradigm 35 — mīstan (neut o-stem: stem = lemma - "an")
LEXICON N35_sg
  +Sg+Nom+Neut:an     # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Neut:as     # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Neut:u      # ;
  +Sg+Akk+Neut:an     # ;
LEXICON N35_pl
  +Pl+Nom+Neut:āi     # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Neut:an     # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Neut:amans  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pl+Dat+Neut:amans   # ;  ! Twan: mīstamans
  ! Prus default with gemination handled inline:
  ! Prus Dat pl = mistammans — gemination must be in stem
  +Pl+Akk+Neut:ans    # ;

! Paradigm 36 — wāiks (masc ja-stem: sg stem = lemma-"s", pl stem shorter)
LEXICON N36_sg
  +Sg+Nom+Masc:s      # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Masc:as     # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Masc:u      # ;
  +Sg+Akk+Masc:an     # ;
LEXICON N36_pl
  +Pl+Nom+Masc:āi     # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Masc:an     # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Masc:ammans # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Masc:ans    # ;

! Paradigm 38 — gewinīs (masc ī-stem: stem = lemma - "s")
LEXICON N38_sg
  +Sg+Nom+Masc:s      # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Masc:jas    # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Masc:ju     # ;
  +Sg+Akk+Masc:jan    # ;
LEXICON N38_pl
  +Pl+Nom+Masc:jai    # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Masc:jan    # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Masc:mans  # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Masc:jans   # ;

! Paradigm 42 — tals (masc u-stem: stem = lemma - "s", but stem gets ll)
LEXICON N42_sg
  +Sg+Nom+Masc:s      # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Masc:us     # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Masc:u      # ;
  +Sg+Akk+Masc:un     # ;
LEXICON N42_pl
  +Pl+Nom+Masc:us     # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Masc:un     # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Masc:umans  # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Masc:uns    # ;

! Paradigm 43 — sūns (masc u-stem: stem = lemma - "s")
LEXICON N43_sg
  +Sg+Nom+Masc:s      # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Masc:us     # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Masc:u      # ;
  +Sg+Akk+Masc:un     # ;
LEXICON N43_pl
  +Pl+Nom+Masc:us     # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Masc:un     # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Masc:ummans  # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Masc:uns    # ;

! Paradigm 44 — pannu (neut u-stem, invariable: full forms)
LEXICON N44
  +Sg+Nom+Neut:pannu      # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Neut:pannus     # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Neut:pannu      # ;
  +Sg+Akk+Neut:pannu      # ;
  +Pl+Nom+Neut:pannu      # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Neut:pannus     # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Neut:pannu      # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Neut:pannu      # ;

! Paradigm 45 — mūsa (fem a-stem: stem = lemma - "a")
LEXICON N45_sg
  +Sg+Nom+Fem:a       # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Fem:as      # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Fem:ai      # ;
  +Sg+Akk+Fem:an      # ;
LEXICON N45_pl
  +Pl+Nom+Fem:as      # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Fem:an      # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Fem:āmans   # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Fem:ans     # ;

! Paradigm 47 — āubirga (masc a-stem noun: stem = lemma - "a")
LEXICON N47_sg
  +Sg+Nom+Masc:a      # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Masc:as     # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Masc:ai     # ;
  +Sg+Akk+Masc:an     # ;
LEXICON N47_pl
  +Pl+Nom+Masc:as     # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Masc:an     # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Masc:amans  # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Masc:ans    # ;

! Paradigm 52 — bitti (fem i-stem: stem = lemma - "i")
LEXICON N52_sg
  +Sg+Nom+Fem:i       # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Fem:is      # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Fem:ei      # ;
  +Sg+Akk+Fem:in      # ;
LEXICON N52_pl
  +Pl+Nom+Fem:is      # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Fem:in      # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Fem:imans   # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Fem:ins     # ;

! Paradigm 53 — zemē (fem ē-stem: stem = lemma - "ē")
LEXICON N53_sg
  +Sg+Nom+Fem:ē       # ;
  +Sg+Gen+Fem:mis     # ;
  +Sg+Dat+Fem:mei     # ;
  +Sg+Akk+Fem:min     # ;
LEXICON N53_pl
  +Pl+Nom+Fem:mis     # ;
  +Pl+Gen+Fem:min     # ;
  +Pl+Dat+Fem:īmans   # ;
  +Pl+Akk+Fem:mins    # ;
